North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 11. Minimum Burial Depth.

§ 65-77.
Minimum burial depth.

When final disposition of a human body entails interment, the top of the uppermost part of the burial vault or other encasement shall be a minimum of 18 inches below the ground surface. This section does not apply to:

Burials where no part of the burial vault or other encasement containing the body is touching the ground.

Burials where the land is located in a family owned cemetery that was established by deed recorded prior to January 1, 1989, and the individual to be buried is to be buried in a surface burial vault in a manner similar to that of the individual’s deceased spouse who was buried prior to January 1, 1981.

History.

1995, c. 123, s. 16; 1999-425, s. 4; 2003-420, s. 8(b).

§§ 65-78 through 65-84.

Reserved for future codification purposes.